Illinois, session 104th, SB2586.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The amount of $48,895,200, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Education 7Assistance Fund to the Board of Trustees of Eastern Illinois 8University to meet its operational expenses for the fiscal 9year ending June 30, 2026. 10    Section 10. The sum of $7,000, or so much thereof as may be 11necessary, is appropriated from the State College and 12University Trust Fund to the Board of Trustees of Eastern 13Illinois University for scholarship grant awards. 14    Section 15. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 15be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 16the Board of Trustees of Eastern Illinois University for the 17Equity-based Student Achievement Program. 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 192025.